Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.070

Bonding requirements.

The board of a state trust company shall require protection and indemnity for clients in reasonable amounts consistent with the bonding requirements for a state bank under RCW 30A.12.030 and as may further be established by rule adopted under this chapter, against dishonesty, fraud, defalcation, forgery, theft, and other similar insurable losses, with corporate insurance or surety companies.

[ 2014 c 37 s 353.]